Utah statutes.
63B-1a-701.   Prior bonds validated -- Exceptions.
All general obligation bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by the
commission before February 14, 2003 and all proceedings had in the
authorization and issuance of them are:
(1)  validated, ratified, and confirmed; and
(2)  declared to constitute legally binding obligations in accordance with
their terms.
